Utah statutes.
77-28b-7.   Role of director.
(1)  The director of the Department of Corrections shall review the
application and materials.  Upon his approval the application and materials
shall be forwarded to the governor for authorization to transfer.
(2)  Applications that are not approved by the director shall be returned to
the sending institution and the inmate shall be notified.
